Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.36.115

Provisional ballots.

All provisional ballots must be visually distinguishable from other ballots and incapable of being tabulated by a voting system.

[ 2011 c 10 s 31; 2005 c 243 s 3.]

NOTES:

Notice to registered poll voters—Elections by mail—2011 c 10: See note following RCW 29A.04.008.